Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.760

Inspection or grading of commodities—No inspection if commodity is to be loaded into defective container.

No inspection shall be made of any commodity which is to be loaded into a vessel, vehicle, or other container, if it appears that the hold, compartment, or other enclosure into which the commodity is to be loaded is in such condition as to contaminate the commodity or lower the grade.

[ 1963 c 124 s 43. Formerly RCW 22.09.430.]